Washington statutes.
RCW 9.02.050

Concealing birth.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5093-S.SL) ***

Every person who shall endeavor to conceal the birth of a child by any disposition of its dead body, whether the child died before or after its birth, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 200; RRS s 2452.]